csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: zaaga'amookan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: zaaga'amookeg
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: zaaga'amookang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: zaaga'angen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: zaaga'angegon
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: zaaga'anziidaa
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: zaaga'an
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [zaaga'amog,zaaga'amok]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: zaaga'andaa
